District of Columbia statutes.
10-302.01

Fee-based use permits.

(a)

The Department may issue a fee-based use permit on a property under its jurisdiction, control, or use, subject to such conditions as the Director may impose and only upon a determination that the use permit:

(1)

Will meet the mission of the Department; and

(2)

Will not adversely impact the use and enjoyment of the area by other members of the public.

(b)

Fee-based use permits shall not be issued solely for their revenue-producing potential.

Mar. 23, 1995, D.C. Law 10-246, § 3a
as added Apr. 23, 2013, D.C. Law 19-280, § 2(c), 60 DCR 2124
This section is referenced in § 10-302, § 10-302.02, and § 10-307.
D.C. Law 19-280 added this section.